Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1524, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1524. A. No person in this state shall hold himself or
herself out as a notary public, attach his or her signature as a
notary public, use a notary public seal, or perform any notarial act
unless he the person is authorized pursuant to the provisions of
Section 114 of Title 49 of the Oklahoma Statutes to perform such
acts.
B. Any person convicted of knowingly and willfully violating
any of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be
Req. No. 13969 Page 1

guil ty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and imprisonment in the county jail for
a term of not less than ninety (90) days. Commented [1]: BDERIV
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 49 O.S. 2021, Section 113, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 226, O.S.L. 2024 (49 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 113), is amended to read as follows:
Section 113. A. In taking an acknowledgment, the notarial
officer must determine, either from personal knowledge or from
satisfactory evidence, that the person appearing before the officer
and making the acknowledgment is the person whose true signature is
on the instrument.
B. In taking a verification upon oath or affirmation, the
notarial officer must determine, either from personal knowledge or
from satisfactory evidence, that the person appearing before the
officer and making the verification is the person whose true
signature is on the statement verified.
C. In witnessing or attesting a signature the notarial officer
must determine, either from personal knowledge or from satisfactory
evidence, that the signature is that of the person appearing before
the officer and named therein.
D. In certifying or attesting a copy of a document or other
item, the notarial officer must determine that the proffered copy is
a full, true, and accurate transcription or reproduction of that
which was copied. In the case of official records, only the
Req. No. 13969 Page 2

cust odian of the official records may issue an official certified
copy.
E. In making or noting a protest of a negotiable instrument the
notarial officer must determine the matters set forth in Section 3-
509 of the Uniform Commercial Code.
F. A notarial officer has satisfactory evidence that a person
is the person whose true signature is on a document if that person
is personally known to the notarial officer, is identified upon the
oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally known to the
notarial officer or is identified on the basis of identification
documents.
G. A notarial officer who performs a notarial act pursuant to
this section without first making in good faith the required
determination of the identity of the person appearing before the
notary shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction be
subject to a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), to
of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and imprisonment in
the county jail for a term of not to exceed ten (10) days, or both
such fine and imprisonment less than ninety (90) days. Commented [2]: BDERIV
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13969 GRS 11/17/25


Req. No. 13969 Page 3